Utah statutes.
46-4-402.    Time and place of sending and receipt.
(1)  Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, an
electronic record is sent when it:
(a)  is addressed properly or otherwise directed properly to an information
processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of
receiving electronic records or information of the type sent and from which
the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic record;
(b)  is in a form capable of being processed by that system; and
(c)  enters an information processing system outside the control of the sender
or of a person that sent the electronic record on behalf of the sender or
enters a region of the information processing system designated or used by the
recipient that is under the control of the recipient.
(2)  Unless otherwise agreed between a sender and the recipient, an electronic
record is received when:
(a)  it enters an information processing system that the recipient has
designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic records or
information of the type sent and from which the recipient is able to retrieve
the electronic record; and
(b)  it is in a form capable of being processed by that system.
(3)  Subsection (2) applies even if the place the information processing
system is located is different from the place the electronic record is deemed
to be received under Subsection (4).
(4) (a)  Unless otherwise expressly provided in the electronic record or
agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic record is deemed to
be sent from the sender's place of business and to be received at the
recipient's place of business.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (4), the following rules apply:
(i)  If the sender or recipient has more than one place of business, the place
of business of that person is the place having the closest relationship to the
underlying transaction.
(ii)  If the sender or the recipient does not have a place of business, the
place of business is the sender's or recipient's residence, as the case may
be.
(5)  An electronic record is received under Subsection (2) even if no
individual is aware of its receipt.
(6)  Receipt of an electronic acknowledgment from an information processing
system described in Subsection (2) establishes that a record was received but,
by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content
received.
(7) (a)  If a person is aware that an electronic record purportedly sent under
Subsection (1), or purportedly received under Subsection (2), was not actually
sent or received, the legal effect of the sending or receipt is determined by
other applicable law.
(b)  Except to the extent permitted by the other law, the requirements of this
Subsection (7) may not be varied by agreement.
